North Dakota, session 69, SB2398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new chapter to title 37 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted as
follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter, "encroachment" means an action that interferes with or negatively impacts
military base testing, training, and other operations and overall military readiness, including issues
related to environmental impact, noise pollution, land development, competition for airspace,
competition for radio frequency spectrum, and urban growth around military installations.
Military impact zones.
A military impact zone is a geographic zone extending from the perimeter of each military base in
the state, which requests the military compatibility committees to provide assistance under this chapter.
The outer boundary of each zone must be established by an assessment in a compatible use study and
contingent upon the missions of each military base.
Military compatibility committees.
1. The agriculture commissioner may create one or more military compatibility committees to
harmonize land, airspace, and electromagnetic spectrum use in military impact zones, review
potential encroachment of military installations in military impact zones, and promote the
sustainability of military operations in the state.
2. A military compatibility committee must be composed of:
a. The agriculture commissioner, or the agriculture commissioner's designee;
b. One representative from each county within the boundaries of a military impact zone,
selected by the board of county commissioners;
c. One representative representing all townships within the boundaries of a military impact
zone, selected by the boards of township supervisors;
d. One representative representing all cities within the boundaries of a military impact zone,
selected by the city council or councils; and
e. On a voluntary basis, the commander of each military installation, or the commander's
designee.
3. Except for activities subject to the United States department of defense military aviation and
installation assurance siting clearinghouse established under section 183(a) of United States
Code title 10 [10 U.S.C. 183(a)], a military compatibility committee shall:
a. Provide guidance to local governments on military-compatibility practices in military
impact zones.

S. B. NO. 2398 - PAGE 2
b. Establish a uniform process in accordance with chapters 11 - 33, 40 - 47, and 40 - 48, and
section 58 - 03 - 12 for all political subdivisions located in a military impact zone to
coordinate zoning, land use, construction, energy development, telecommunications, and
other infrastructure projects that could impact military radar, airspace, communications,
or operational readiness relevant to mission compatibility.

S. B. NO. 2398 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2398.
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 73 Nays 19 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State